Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB300.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 198B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 8 of this Act:
(1) "Contractor":
(a) Means a person in the business of contracting, or offering to contract, to
provide goods or services relating to real estate; and
(b) Includes any person that directly or indirectly solicits or offers a real estate
goods or services contract;
(2) "Contractor's license" or "license" means the license issued by the department to
a contractor;
(3) "Goods or services relating to real estate":
(a) Means goods, services, or goods and services relating to real estate;
(b) Includes but is not limited to any:
1. Repair or remediation of roofing, gutter, downspout, or siding;
2. Tree cutting and removal;
3. Mold remediation;
4. Debris removal;
5. Water restoration and waterproofing;
6. Smoke and fire restoration;
7. Contents packout; and
8. General contractor services; and
(c) Does not include:
1. Services to a residential building of more than four (4) units;
2. Services to a commercial building; or
3. Building a new home or housing development;
Page 1 of 13
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1045
(4) "Person" has the same meaning as in KRS 367.110;
(5) "Real estate":
(a) Means any parcel of real estate located in this state that is used for any
purpose; and
(b) Includes:
1. Residential real estate; and
2. Commercial real estate; and
(6) "Real estate goods or services contract" means a contract for the provision of
goods or services relating to real estate.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 198B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person who is not licensed as a contractor shall not represent himself or herself
to the public as a contractor or use any terms, titles, or abbreviations that express
or imply that the person is a contractor.
(2) A person shall not practice as a contractor, unless that person has met the
requirements of Sections 1 to 8 of this Act.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 198B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The department shall administer and enforce Sections 1 to 8 of this Act and shall
evaluate the qualifications of applicants for licensure.
(2) The department may:
(a) Refuse to issue or renew a contractor's license;
(b) Suspend or revoke a contractor's license;
(c) Impose supervisory or probationary conditions upon a licensee;
(d) Impose administrative disciplinary fines;
(e) Issue written reprimands or admonishments; and
(f) Take any combination of the actions permitted in this subsection.
Page 2 of 13
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1045
(3) The department may seek injunctive relief in the Franklin Circuit Court or the
Circuit Court of the county in which the violation occurred or the business of the
accused is located to stop any unlawful practice prohibited by Sections 1 to 8 of
this Act and administrative regulations promulgated thereunder. The department
may also seek injunctive relief if unlicensed persons inappropriately use the term
contractor.
(4) The department may enter into reciprocal agreements with other states having
licensure, certification, or registration qualifications and requirements of a
similar scope of practice to those of this state.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 198B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A necessary to carry out Sections 1 to 8 of this Act, including:
(a) Issuing and renewing contractor's licenses to applicants who meet the
requirements of Section 5 of this Act;
(b) Denying, suspending, or revoking a contractor's license;
(c) Maintaining a current register of license holders as a matter of public
record;
(d) Establishing procedures for receiving, investigating, and resolving
complaints against license holders;
(e) Conducting administrative hearings in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B
for disciplinary actions taken under paragraph (b) of this subsection and
Section 3 of this Act; and
(f) 1. Assessing fees for the issuance and renewal of licenses to cover
administrative and operating expenses of the department; and
2. Authorizing all disbursements necessary to administer Sections 1 to 8
of this Act.
Page 3 of 13
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1045
(2) The department shall establish through administrative regulation the required fee
amounts to be paid by licensees and applicants for licensure under Sections 1 to 8
of this Act, including but not limited to:
(a) For an application for initial licensure as a contractor, a nonrefundable fee
not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200);
(b) For the renewal of a contractor license, a fee not to exceed two hundred
dollars ($200);
(c) For a duplicate or replacement license, a fee not to exceed twenty-five
dollars ($25);
(d) For failure to renew a license for a contractor, a reinstatement fee not to
exceed one hundred dollars ($100); and
(e) Other reasonable fees for administrative services.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 198B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
An applicant for a contractor's license shall:
(1) Be at least eighteen (18) years of age;
(2) Be a citizen of the United States or a resident alien who is authorized to work in
the United States;
(3) Have paid to the department the application fee and the appropriate examination
fee, which shall not exceed the actual cost of the examination;
(4) Have achieved a passing score, as set by the department, on all portions of the
examination required by the department;
(5) Have met the training and experience requirements established in administrative
regulations promulgated by the department; and
(6) Have submitted proof that he or she has complied with workers' compensation
and unemployment insurance laws and administrative regulations and has
obtained a general liability insurance policy of not less than five hundred
Page 4 of 13
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1045
thousand dollars ($500,000).
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 198B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The department shall select and approve examinations to be used in determining
the competency of persons to be licensed under Sections 1 to 8 of this Act.
Examinations selected and approved for licensing shall be nationally recognized
examinations that have been determined through proper validation techniques to
measure successfully an individual's competency to perform the licensed practice.
(2) The department shall offer the examinations on a regularly scheduled basis in
localities around the state.
(3) The department may contract with an outside entity or testing service for the
administration of examinations required for licensure.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 198B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The contractors fund is hereby created as a trust and agency account to be
administered by the department. All moneys collected by the department under
Sections 1 to 8 of this Act shall be deposited into the fund.
(2) Moneys deposited into the contractors fund shall be used for the department's
expenses related to the regulation and enforcement of Sections 1 to 8 of this Act.
(3) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 198B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The department may, following a hearing pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B, impose
sanctions specified in Section 3 of this Act upon proof that the licensee has:
(a) Misrepresented or concealed a material fact in obtaining a license or in the
reinstatement thereof;
Page 5 of 13
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1045
(b) Been incompetent or negligent in the practice of performing contracting
work;
(c) Failed to comply with an order issued by the department or an assurance of
voluntary compliance; or
(d) Violated any provision of Sections 1 to 8 of this Act or administrative
regulations promulgated thereunder.
(2) One (1) year from the date of a revocation, any former licensee whose license has
been revoked may petition the department for reinstatement. The department
shall investigate the petition and may reinstate the license upon a finding that the
applicant has complied with any terms prescribed by the department and is again
able to competently engage in the practice of performing contracting work.
(3) At any time during the investigative or hearing processes, the department may
enter into an agreed order or accept an assurance of voluntary compliance with
the license holder which effectively deals with the complaint.
(4) The department may reconsider, modify, or reverse its probations, suspensions, or
other disciplinary actions.
Section 9. KRS 367.620 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 367.620 to 367.628:
(1) "Contractor":
(a) Means a person in the business of contracting, or offering to contract, to
provide goods or services relating to real estate; and
(b) Includes any person that directly or indirectly solicits or offers a real estate
goods or services contract;
(2) "Goods or services relating to real estate":
(a) Means goods, services, or goods and services relating to real estate;
(b) Includes but is not limited to any:
1. Repair or remediation of roofing, gutter, downspout, or siding;
Page 6 of 13
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1045
2. Tree cutting and removal;
3. Mold remediation;
4. Debris removal;
5. Water restoration and waterproofing;
6. Smoke and fire restoration;
7. Contents packout; and
8. General contractor services; and
(c)[(b)] Does not include:
1. Services to a residential building of more than four (4) units;
2. Services to a commercial building; or
3. Building a new home or housing development[Includes any:
1. Repair, replacement, construction, reconstruction, or improvement of
real estate; and
2. Tree or debris removal];
(3) "Insured" means a person that is entitled, or may be entitled, to receive benefits or
payments under a property, casualty, or property and casualty insurance policy;
(4) "Person" has the same meaning as in KRS 367.110;
(5) "Real estate":
(a) Means any parcel of real estate located in this state that is used for any
purpose; and
(b) Includes:
1. Residential real estate; and
2. Commercial real estate; and
(6) "Real estate goods or services contract" means a contract for the provision of goods
or services relating to real estate[, where the goods or services are expected to be
paid from property, casualty, or property and casualty insurance proceeds].
Section 10. KRS 367.622 is amended to read as follows:
Page 7 of 13
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1045
(1) A person who enters into a real estate goods or services contract with a contractor
may cancel the contract prior to midnight of the fifth business day after the person
has:
(a) Entered into a contract with the contractor; or
(b) Received written notice from the insurer that all or part of the claim is not a
covered loss under the insurance policy.
(2) Cancellation shall be deemed to have occurred when the person does any of the
following:
(a) Personally delivers written notice of cancellation to the contractor;
(b) Deposits written notice of cancellation in the United States mail, postage
prepaid, and addressed to the contractor at the address stated in the contract;
or
(c) Transmits notice of cancellation to the contractor by facsimile or email.
(3) Notice of cancellation need not take a particular form and is sufficient if it indicates
by any form of written or recorded expression the intention of the person not to be
bound by the contract.
Section 11. KRS 367.624 is amended to read as follows:
Prior to entering into a real estate goods or services contract with any person, a contractor
shall furnish the person with:
(1) The complete agreement between the person and the contractor, with a clear
description of any other documents which are or shall be incorporated into the
agreement;
(2) The contractor's full legal name, business names, principal address, and
registration number;
(3) The mailing address of the contractor through which written communication may
be received;
(4)[(2)] The telephone number of the contractor and, if applicable, the contractor's
Page 8 of 13
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1045
facsimile number and email address;
(5) The name of the contractor's insurer, the type of insurance coverage as required
by Section 5 of this Act, and the insurance policy limits obtained by the
contractor;
(6) An itemized description of the work to be done, any emergency services to be
completed, and the materials to be used in the performance of the real estate
goods or services contract;
(7) The total itemized amount agreed to be paid for the work to be performed under
the real estate goods or services contract;
(8) A description of who will be performing the work, including but not limited to a
subcontractor, independent contractor, day laborer, and any other person who
would be a contractor under subsection (1) of Section 9 of this Act;
(9) An approximation of the costs expected to be borne by the person;
(10) A provision allowing payment to be made by cash, check, or credit card, at the
person's discretion;
(11) The signatures of all persons party to the contract;
(12) An itemized statement identifying any aspect of the real estate goods or services
contract that is not expected to be covered under an insurance policy;
(13)[(3)] A statement in at least ten (10) point boldface type in immediate proximity to
the space reserved for the signature of the person that states:
"You may cancel this contract at any time before midnight on the fifth business
day after entering into this contract with your contractor. You may also cancel
this contract at any time before midnight on the fifth business day after you have
received written notification from the insurer that all or any part of the contracted
goods, services, or goods and services is not a covered loss under the property,
casualty, or property and casualty insurance policy. This right to cancel is in
addition to any other rights of cancellation you may have under state or federal law
Page 9 of 13
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1045
or regulation. See the attached Notice of Cancellation form for an explanation of
this right."; and
(14)[(4)] A fully completed form in duplicate, under the conspicuous caption "NOTICE
OF CANCELLATION," and attached to but easily detachable from the contract, in
at least ten (10) point boldface type that shall read as follows:
"NOTICE OF CANCELLATION
.......................................................
(enter date of transaction)
You may cancel this contract without penalty or monetary obligation before
midnight of the fifth business day after entering into this contract with your
contractor. You may also[If you are notified by the insurer that all or any part of
the contracted goods, services, or goods and services is not a covered loss under the
property, casualty, or property and casualty insurance policy, you may] cancel this
contract without penalty or monetary obligation before midnight of the fifth
business day after you have received [the ]notice from the insurer that all or any
part of the contracted goods, services, or goods and services is not a covered loss
under the property, casualty, or property and casualty insurance policy. To cancel
this transaction, you may use any of the following methods: mail or otherwise
deliver a signed and dated copy of this cancellation notice, or any other written
notice of cancellation which you sign and date, to (enter physical address of
contractor), or email a notice of cancellation to (enter email address of contractor),
or transmit a notice of cancellation to (enter facsimile number of contractor), not
later than midnight of the fifth day after you receive notice from the insurer. If you
cancel, any payments made by you under the contract will be returned to you
within ten (10) business days following receipt by the contractor of your
cancellation notice, and any security interest arising out of the transaction will be
cancelled. You shall retain a copy of the notice of cancellation that is transmitted
Page 10 of 13
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1045
to the contractor.
I HEREBY CANCEL THIS TRANSACTION.
........................................................
(Date)
........................................................
(Buyer's Signature)"
Section 12. KRS 367.628 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, a contractor,
or person representing a contractor, shall not represent, negotiate, or advertise
to represent or negotiate on behalf of any insured on any insurance claim in
connection with the provision of goods or services relating to real estate.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit a contractor, or
person representing a contractor, from:
1. Providing an estimate for the provision of goods or services relating to
real estate; or
2. Conferring with an insurance company's representative about damage to
real estate after a claim has been submitted by an insured.
(c) This subsection shall not apply to a public adjuster licensed under Subtitle 9
of KRS Chapter 304.
(2) Where goods or services relating to real estate are expected to be paid from
property, casualty, or property and casualty insurance proceeds, a contractor or
person representing a contractor shall not:
(a) Cause damage to any part of the real estate in order to increase the scope of
goods or services provided[,] or encourage a person to cause damage to any
part of the real estate in order to secure a contract for goods or services;
(b) Offer to pay or rebate all or any portion of an insurance deductible or claims
proceeds as an inducement to the sale of goods or services by a contractor;
Page 11 of 13
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1045
(c) Grant an allowance or discount against the fee to be charged by a contractor;
(d) Pay or offer to pay the insured, or his or her representative, for whom services
have been or will be performed, for any reason, any form of compensation in
excess of one hundred dollars ($100), including but not limited to a:
1. Bonus;
2. Coupon;
3. Credit;
4. Gift;
5. Prize;
6. Referral fee; or
7. Any other item having a monetary value;[ or]
(e) File or claim a mechanic's lien pursuant to KRS 376.010 against an insured by
reason of the insured's failure or refusal to pay any excess charge over and
above the amount paid or expected to be paid by an insurer under a property,
casualty, or property and casualty insurance policy;
(f) Require a deposit of more than fifty percent 50% of the contract price;
(g) Mandate that a particular form of payment be made in order to start
services;
(h) Induce the sale of any goods or services by offering or providing any
upgraded work, material, or product;
(i) Operate without a contractor's license issued by the department in
accordance with Sections 1 to 8 of this Act;
(j) Abandon or fail to perform, without justification, any ongoing contract or
project or deviate from or disregard plans or specifications in any material
respect without consent of the consumer;
(k) Fail to credit the consumer for any payment the consumer has made to the
contractor in connection with the contract;
Page 12 of 13
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1045
(l) Make any material misrepresentation in the procurement of a contract or
make any false promise likely to influence, persuade, or induce the
procurement of a contract;
(m) Violate the building code of the state or municipality;
(n) Fail to notify the department within thirty (30) business days of any change
of trade name or address, or conducting a business in any name other than
the one in which the contractor is registered;
(o) Fail to pay for materials or services rendered in connection with his or her
operating as a contractor where he or she has received sufficient funds as
payment for the particular construction work, project, or operation for
which the services or materials were rendered or purchased;
(p) Perform the reporting, adjusting, or negotiation of a claim on behalf of the
consumer or receive compensation for the referral to any entity that reports,
adjusts, or negotiates a claim on behalf of a consumer; or
(q) Fail to possess any insurance required as defined by Section 5 of this Act or
any other law.
Section 13. This Act applies to contracts entered on or after the effective date of
this Act.
Page 13 of 13
XXXX 12/18/2025 3:07 PM Jacketed